Utah statutes.
20A-5-204.   Duplicate registration.

(1)  Upon finding duplicate registration, the county clerk shall first check for errors in the record.

(2)  If duplicate registration does exist, the clerk shall:

(a)  eliminate one registration entry; and

(b)  change the date of voter registration on the voter's file to the most recent registration date.

